Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4064
Fees.

(1) Before any license or appointment is issued or renewed under the Insurance Producers Licensing Act or before any appointment is terminated, the person requesting such license shall pay or cause to be paid to the director the following fee or fees, if applicable, as established by the director:

(a) For each insurance producer license, a fee not to exceed one hundred dollars, except that if any other state imposes additional or greater fees, obligations, or prohibitions on Nebraska resident insurance producers, then such additional or greater fees, obligations, or prohibitions shall be imposed upon similar insurance producers of such other state applying for a license in Nebraska;

(b) For each annual appointment, a fee not to exceed ten dollars;

(c) For each termination of an appointment, a fee not to exceed ten dollars;

(d) A late renewal fee not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars;

(e) A reinstatement fee not to exceed one hundred seventy-five dollars; and

(f) For each business entity license, a fee not to exceed fifty dollars, except that if any other state imposes additional or greater fees, obligations, or prohibitions on Nebraska business entities, then such additional or greater fees, obligations, or prohibitions shall be imposed upon similar business entities of such other state applying for a license in Nebraska.

(2) If a licensed person (a) desires to add a line or lines of insurance to his or her existing license, (b) seeks to change any other information contained in the license for any reason, or (c) applies for a duplicate license, such person shall pay to the director a fee established by the director to cover the expense of replacing the license.

(3) The director shall not prorate fees imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and shall not refund fees to any person in the event of a license denial. The director may refund fees paid pursuant to this section if the payment has been made in error.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 18;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 27;

Laws 2026, LB967, § 6.
July 18, 2026